Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8610
Vocational rehabilitation services.

(1) The commission is authorized to accept the provisions of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, 29 U.S.C. 701 et seq., and to cooperate with the United States Government in any way necessary to enable the commission to receive federal funds for the vocational rehabilitation of blind persons as provided in such act and the provisions of Titles II and XVI of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 301 et seq.

(2) The commission shall provide vocational rehabilitation services for blind persons, including, but not limited to, prevocational training, maintenance during training, transportation, occupational tools and equipment, vocational training, medical and surgical care and hospitalization, and prosthetic appliances.

Laws 1947, c. 332, § 2, p. 1050;

Laws 1976, LB 674, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 124, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 336, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 928;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-210.02;

Laws 2000, LB 352, § 10.